District of Columbia statutes.
47-4806

Transfer, sale, or assignment.

(a)

All or any portion of tax credits issued in accordance with the provisions of this section may be transferred, sold, or assigned.

(b)

An owner or transferee desiring to make a transfer, sale, or assignment shall submit to the Chief Financial Officer a statement that describes the amount of District of Columbia low- income housing tax credit for which such transfer, sale, or assignment of District of Columbia low-income housing tax credit is eligible. The owner shall provide to the Chief Financial Officer appropriate information so that the low-income housing tax credit can be properly allocated.

(c)

If the recapture of District of Columbia low-income housing tax credits is required pursuant to§ 47-4804, any statement submitted to the Chief Financial Officer as required in subsection (b) of this section shall include the:

(1)

Proportion of the District of Columbia low-income housing tax credit required to be recaptured;

(2)

Identity of each transferee subject to recapture; and

(3)

Amount of credit previously transferred to such transferee.

History

Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 7142(b), 61 DCR 9990